District of Columbia statutes.
34-2604

Rules.

The Commission shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Oct. 19, 1989, D.C. Law 8-45, § 5, 36 DCR 5779

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1904.

Prior Codifications